Wyoming, session 2026, SF0067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-10-101(a) and (b) is amended to
read:
19-10-101. Organization by governor; appointment of
council; removal; control.
(a) If the national guard of Wyoming is ordered into
the service of the United States, The governor may organize
and maintain within this state during that period, under
such regulations as the secretary of defense may prescribe,
such military forces as may be authorized by the secretary
of defense or as the governor deems necessary for the
defense to preserve the public peace, to execute the laws
of the state, to suppress tumult, riot, mob or invasion, to
respond to either natural or manmade emergencies within the
state, to support national wildland fire response or to
perform other duties as the governor may require. The
forces shall be known as the Wyoming state guard. Insofar
as practicable, the existing laws, rules and regulations
governing the national guard shall be applied to used as a
model for the control and governance of the Wyoming state
guard. The force shall be of such strength as directed by
the secretary of defense, with such expansion in the future
as may be authorized. The Wyoming state guard shall be of
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0067
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
such strength and shall be armed, trained and equipped in
such manner as may be prescribed by the secretary of
defense or the governor of Wyoming.
(b) For the purpose of coordinating desirable
national state defense activities, the governor shall
appoint a Wyoming state council of defense. The council,
subject to the approval of the governor, may organize
necessary subordinate branches and establish rules and
regulations for the operation of the council and
subordinate branches, and assist in all matters pertaining
to the Wyoming state guard and other state or national
defense activities not otherwise covered by law.
Appointment to the council of defense is not limited by any
requirements as to prior military or naval service. The
governor may remove any member as provided in W.S. 9-1-202.
Section 2. There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the office of
the governor for purposes of appointing and convening a
Wyoming state council of defense and for establishing and
equipping the Wyoming state guard as the governor deems
necessary. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the office of the governor's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0067
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3